Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202280-334
Existing suits and proceedings; how treated.

No suit, action, or other proceeding, judicial or administrative, lawfully commenced prior to July 1, 2017, or which could have been commenced prior to that date, by or against the Division of Veterans’ Homes of the Department of Health and Human Services, or the director or any employee thereof in such director's or employee's official capacity or in relation to the discharge of his or her official duties, shall abate by reason of the transfer of duties and functions from the Division of Veterans’ Homes of the Department of Health and Human Services to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs.

Laws 2017, LB340, § 14.